Utah statutes.
62A-7-108.5.   Records -- Property of division.

(1)  All records maintained by programs that are under contract with the division to provide services to youth offenders, are the property of the division and shall be returned to it when the youth offender is terminated from the program.

(2)  The division shall maintain an accurate audit trail of information provided to other programs or agencies regarding youth offenders under its jurisdiction.

